Kentucky statutes. TITLE VI Financial Administration
Monitoring and Revision of Budget

48.400.
Office of State Budget Director to monitor financial condition of Commonwealth — Quarterly reports — Notification of actual or anticipated surplus or decrease in tax receipts.

The Office of State Budget Director shall continuously monitor the financial situation of the Commonwealth. Based upon reports from budget units and its own estimates, the office shall no later than the tenth day of each month or more often if necessary, report to the Governor, the Chief Justice, and the Legislative Research Commission on the financial condition of the Commonwealth and its budget units.

Within thirty (30) days of the close of each fiscal quarter, the state budget director shall report to the head of each branch budget the actual revenue receipts from the just-concluded quarter, as well as the projected revenue receipts for the next three (3) fiscal quarters. The report shall include a comparison with the enacted estimates and shall note any potential consequences to the Commonwealth’s fiscal condition as a result of revenue receipts that differ from those used in the enacted estimates.

If there is an actual or anticipated surplus or decrease in total estimated tax receipts, as reflected in the report required by subsection (2) of this section, immediate notification shall be given to all branches of government.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 450, § 23, effective July 1, 1983; 1994, ch. 387, § 3, effective July 15, 1994; 2000, ch. 46, § 18, effective July 14, 2000; 2009, ch. 78, § 12, effective June 25, 2009.

48.500.
Interpretation of branch budget bills — Legislative review.

Subject to the provisions of this section, when the General Assembly is not in session, all questions that arise as to the meaning of items in a branch budget bill shall be decided by the Finance and Administration Cabinet for the executive branch budget bill and the Transportation Cabinet budget bill, and by the Chief Justice and the Legislative Research Commission for their respective branches of government.

The secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, the Chief Justice, and the Legislative Research Commission shall transmit decisions made under subsection (1) of this section to the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue of the Legislative Research Commission and shall include, in detail, the reasons for such decisions.

If the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue disapproves a decision made under this section, the decision shall not be implemented unless it is:

Revised to comply with the objections of the committee; or

The committee is informed, in writing, in detail, within thirty (30) days of the committee’s disapproval, that a determination has been made not to comply with the objections of the committee.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 450, § 24, effective July 1, 1983; 1990, ch. 507, § 15, effective July 13, 1990; 2009, ch. 78, § 13, effective June 25, 2009; 2011, ch. 73, § 11, effective June 8, 2011.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. III, 10 at 1749.

48.600.
Appropriation reductions in accordance with budget reduction plans upon actual or official revenue estimate shortfall of five percent or less.

If an official revenue estimate is issued reflecting a revenue shortfall in the general fund or road fund of five percent (5%) or less, or if there is an actual revenue shortfall at the close of a fiscal year in the general fund or road fund of five percent (5%) or less, as determined by the Office of State Budget Director, the Governor, the Chief Justice, and the Legislative Research Commission shall make any appropriation reductions for the budget units of their respective branches of government in accordance with the budget reduction plan included in the enacted branch budget bill.

No budget revision action shall be taken by any branch head in excess of the actual or projected revenue shortfall.

Appropriation reductions shall be reported to the standing Appropriations and Revenue Committees of each house or to the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue, as appropriate.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 450, § 25, effective July 1, 1983; 1988, ch. 273, § 7, effective July 15, 1988; 1994, ch. 387, § 4, effective July 15, 1994; 2000, ch. 46, § 19, effective July 14, 2000; 2009, ch. 78, § 14, effective June 25, 2009.

48.605.
Revision of allotments within appropriations.

Allotments within appropriations for the activities and purposes contained in an enacted branch budget bill may be revised as follows:

For the executive branch, upon authorization of the state budget director at the request of the head of a budget unit;

For the judicial branch, upon authorization of the director of the Administrative Office of the Courts, or his designee; and,

For the legislative branch, upon authorization of the director of the Legislative Research Commission, or his designee.

A copy of the request and determinations shall be transmitted to the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue prior to the implementation of the revision of the allotment.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 387, § 7, effective July 15, 1994.

48.610.
Schedule of quarterly allotments of appropriations.

By June 1 of the preceding fiscal year, each branch of government shall submit to the Finance and Administration Cabinet a schedule of quarterly allotments of appropriations for each budget unit of the branch for the next fiscal year. Allotments shall conform with the appropriations in the enacted branch budget bills or other appropriation provisions.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 450, § 26, effective July 1, 1983; 1994, ch. 387, § 5, effective July 15, 1994; 2011, ch. 73, § 12, effective June 8, 2011.

48.620.
Revision of allotment schedule.

Allotments shall be made as provided by the allotment schedule, and may be revised upon the written certification of the Governor, the Chief Justice, and the Legislative Research Commission for their respective branches of government. No revisions of the allotment schedule may provide for an allotment or allotments in excess of the amount appropriated to that budget unit in a branch budget bill, or for expenditure for any other purpose than specified in a branch budget bill.

Revisions of allotments under this section shall be reported and reviewed as provided by KRS 48.500(3).

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 450, § 27, effective July 1, 1983; 1990, ch. 507, § 16, effective July 13, 1990; 2009, ch. 78, § 15, effective June 25, 2009; 2011, ch. 73, § 13, effective June 8, 2011.

48.630.
Allotment of unbudgeted appropriation — Legislative committee review — Use of unanticipated restricted or federal funds — Exemptions.

An unbudgeted appropriation shall not be allotted without prior review and action by the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue as provided for in this section.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, any request for allotment of unbudgeted appropriations from any fund source shall be made in writing by the head of the budget unit and transmitted simultaneously to the state budget director and the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue.

The state budget director may recommend a proposed revision to a specified appropriation in any branch budget bill to the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue by the seventh day of each month.

If the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue fails to review and act upon the proposed revision by the last day of the month, the proposed revision shall be deemed to have been reviewed and favorably acted upon.

The Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue shall review the proposed expenditure of the unbudgeted appropriation for conformance with the purposes of the proposed appropriation and the enacted branch budget bill, and any other relevant statute, by the last day of each month.

If the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue disapproves of the proposed revision of the enacted appropriation, the budget adjustment shall be invalid unless it is:

Revised to comply with the objections of the committee; or

The committee is informed, in writing, in detail, within thirty (30) days of the committee’s disapproval, that a determination has been made not to comply with the objections of the committee.

If an emergency unbudgeted appropriation revision is required due to a declared natural disaster, calamity, or impending deficit in an enacted appropriation as certified by the Governor, the state budget director may effect an emergency revised appropriation, with the approval of the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, and with concurrent notification to the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue of the action and its justification.

If a budget unit not listed in any enacted branch budget bill receives unanticipated restricted funds or federal funds, the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, upon written request from the agency head with appropriate documentation of the amount, source, purpose, necessity, and use of the moneys, may authorize the credit and expenditure of these funds for statutory purposes, upon recommendation of the state budget director and review and action by the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue pursuant to the conditions and procedures prescribed by this section. The secretary shall cause to be established a separate discrete restricted funds or federal funds account, as appropriate, for the receipt and disbursement of these funds and shall establish the maximum sum which may be credited and expended from the authorized account.

Institutions of higher education shall be exempt from all conditions and procedures in this section with respect to the authority of the state budget director and the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet to review and approve unbudgeted restricted funds or federal funds or revisions to appropriations in excess of any enacted branch budget bill; however, in the event of a revision, an institution of higher education shall report unbudgeted restricted funds and federal funds to the state budget director and the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue.

Unbudgeted appropriations for expenditure in the judicial branch budget and the legislative branch budget shall be exempt from all conditions and procedures in this section, except that each branch head, or its designee, shall report unbudgeted restricted funds and federal funds to the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue and transmit an informational copy to the state budget director.

The Legislative Research Commission shall maintain records of the findings of the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue and the determinations and reports of actions by the state budget director and transmit these records to the General Assembly when next convened.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 387, § 6, effective July 15, 1994; 2011, ch. 73, § 14, effective June 8, 2011.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See Judicial Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 162, Pt. III, 8 at 984.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. III, 2 at 1749.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. III, 3 at 1749.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. III, 38 at 1754.

See Legislative Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 200, Pt. III, 6 at 1765.

48.700.
General fund — Surplus fund account.

There is hereby created in the general fund of the State Treasury a surplus fund account subject to the following terms and conditions:

It shall contain all surplus tax receipts accruing to the general fund as provided by KRS 48.140(3);

Except as provided in KRS

48.705

, it shall contain all funds lapsed from general fund receipts not otherwise appropriated;

It shall contain all receipts from the sale of surplus property purchased with general fund tax receipts and not otherwise appropriated;

Except as provided in KRS

48.705

, it shall contain all general fund tax revenues in excess of estimates;

It shall contain all moneys saved as a result of a reorganization of state government operations funded by the general fund;

Funds in the account shall be invested at interest and the interest shall also accrue to this account;

It shall contain any other funds which are required by law or regulation to accrue to the surplus account of the general fund; and

No expenditures shall be made from this account unless appropriated by the General Assembly or unless required by the budget reduction provisions of a branch budget bill, or as provided by KRS

48.130

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 450, § 28, effective July 1, 1983; 1990, ch. 507, § 17, effective July 13, 1990; 1995 (3rd Ex. Sess.), ch. 2, § 5, effective November 3, 1995; 2009, ch. 78, § 16, effective June 25, 2009.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. III, 22 at 1750.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. VII at 1758.

48.705.
General fund — Budget reserve trust fund account.

A budget reserve trust fund account is hereby created in the general fund, pursuant to KRS

45.305

. The budget reserve trust fund account shall be funded through direct appropriations, and surplus amounts as provided in subsection (2) of this section. Moneys in the account shall remain unallotted unless required by the provisions of this section.

Each fiscal year, except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, within thirty (30) days of the end of the fiscal year, the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall cause to be deposited to the budget reserve trust fund account the lesser of the following amounts:

Fifty percent (50%) of the general fund surplus; or

The amount necessary from the general fund surplus to make the balance of the budget reserve trust fund account equal to five percent (5%) of the actual general fund receipts collected during the fiscal year just ended, as determined by the Finance and Administration Cabinet.

Any amounts to be deposited to the budget reserve trust fund account from the general fund surplus shall be determined after the surplus has been reduced by the amount necessary to implement the provisions of any surplus expenditure plan authorized by KRS

48.140

and enacted as a part of a branch budget bill.

If, at the close of any fiscal year, the budget reserve trust fund account has a balance equal to or greater than five percent (5%) of the actual general fund receipts collected during the fiscal year just ended, as determined by the Finance and Administration Cabinet, the deposits required under subsection (2) of this section shall be suspended for that year.

Moneys in the budget reserve trust fund account may be appropriated by the General Assembly in a regular or special session.

Before authorizing any allotments from the budget reserve trust fund account, the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall notify in writing the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue. The notice shall include the amount and purpose for the proposed allotment.

Within thirty (30) days of the close of each fiscal year, the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall report to the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue the general fund receipts collected for the fiscal year just ended, the balance of the budget reserve trust fund account, and any amounts deposited to the budget reserve trust fund account pursuant to the provisions of subsection (2) of this section.

All sums appropriated or deposited to the budget reserve trust fund account shall not lapse at the close of the fiscal year but shall carry forward into the next fiscal year.

History.

Enact. Acts 1995 (3rd Ex. Sess.), ch. 2, § 1, effective November 3, 1995; 2000, ch. 46, § 20, effective July 14, 2000; 2009, ch. 78, § 17, effective June 25, 2009.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. III, 22 at 1750.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. VII at 1758.

48.710.
Road fund — Surplus fund account.

There is hereby created in the road fund of the State Treasury a surplus fund account subject to the following terms and conditions:

It shall contain all surplus tax receipts accruing to the road fund as provided by KRS 48.140(3).

It shall contain all funds lapsed from moneys originating from road fund receipts;

It shall contain all receipts from the sale of surplus property purchased with road fund receipts;

It shall contain all road fund receipts in excess of estimates;

It shall contain all moneys saved as a result of a reorganization of state government operations funded by the road fund;

Funds in the account shall be invested at interest and the interest shall also accrue to this account;

It shall contain any other funds which are required by law or regulation to accrue to the surplus account of the road fund; and

No expenditures shall be made from this account unless appropriated by the General Assembly or unless required by budget reduction provisions of a branch budget bill, or as provided by KRS

48.130

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 450, § 29, effective July 1, 1983; 1990, ch. 507, § 18, effective July 13, 1990; 2009, ch. 78, § 18, effective June 25, 2009.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. IX at 1759.

48.715.
Emergency disaster relief account.

An emergency disaster relief account is hereby created in the road fund.

The account shall contain moneys directly appropriated by the General Assembly from the road fund.

Moneys in the emergency disaster relief account shall only be expended on projects specifically designated by the General Assembly in a regular or special session.

Interest earned on moneys in the account shall accrue to the account.

All sums appropriated or deposited to the account shall not lapse at the close of the fiscal year but shall carry forward into the next fiscal year.

HISTORY:

2021 ch. 156, § 32, effective March 29, 2021.

48.720.
Lapse of appropriated general or road fund debt service for canceled projects and excess amounts.

In the event that any authorized capital construction or equipment purchase projects are canceled, or if conditions imposed by any branch budget bill are not met, any appropriated general or road fund debt service for those projects shall remain unallotted and lapse to the credit of the respective surplus account. In the event that general or road fund appropriated debt service is more than is required due to favorable interest rates, refinancing, or timing variances, the excess debt service in each fiscal year shall remain unallotted and lapse to the credit of the respective surplus account.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 387, § 9, effective July 15, 1994.

2016-2018 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2016 Ky. Acts ch. 149, Pt. I, A, 32 (1) at 1055.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2016 Ky. Acts ch. 149, Pt. III, 32 at 1133.

48.730.
Required notifications by state agency when declining entitlement to federal funds.

No state agency entitled to federal funds which would represent one hundred percent (100%) of the cost of a program in which the state participates shall decline to accept or receive that entitlement without notification to the state budget director and the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 387, § 8, effective July 15, 1994.

48.800.
Fiscal reporting to branches of government — Annual financial and program status reports.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall prepare and submit to each branch of government:

Within ten (10) days after the close of each month copies of the accounts of the budget units of that branch of government with the appropriations and allotments in favor of its budget units and the balances as of the beginning and end of that month.

Within ten (10) days after the close of each month, prepare and transmit to each branch of government a report embodying a summary statement of the actual financial condition of each fund of the major fund groups as of the close of the previous month, a summary statement showing the receipts and payments of each such fund for the previous month and for the current fiscal year to the close of the previous month, a summary budget statement for each such fund showing the available cash balance as of the end of the previous month, the amount of cash estimated to be realized from each source during the remaining months of the fiscal year, the total means of financing, the amount of the unallotted balances of all appropriations, the estimated amount of unliquidated commitments, and the estimated cash surplus or deficit.

Within ninety (90) days of the close of a fiscal year, file with each branch of government a complete report of the financial transactions of the preceding fiscal year and of the financial condition of the Commonwealth as of the end of that fiscal year, with such comments and supplementary data necessary to make the report complete and easy to understand.

Each branch of government shall publish a financial and program status report, within ninety (90) days of the close of a fiscal year, detailing for that period, activities, appropriations, allotments, expenditures, receipts, transfers, encumbrances and available balances of each budget unit of the branch, and an explanation of the programs and services provided by the branch.

In order to effectuate the budget review function of the General Assembly, each branch of government shall make available, on a continuing basis, records which detail activities, appropriations, allotments, expenditures, receipts, transfers, encumbrances and available balances of each budget unit of the branch. Such records shall be made available in the form necessary to facilitate their read only accession by means of electronic data processing procedures employed by the Legislative Research Commission.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 450, § 30, effective July 1, 1983; 1984, ch. 131, § 4, effective July 13, 1984.

48.810.
Strategic plan — Progress report — Methodology — Training course — Electronic database.

Each program cabinet, the Department for Local Government, the Department of Military Affairs, and the Commonwealth Office of Technology shall develop and submit a four (4) year strategic plan to meet the broad goals outlined by the Governor and shall submit an electronic copy of the full plan and an electronic copy of a brief summary of that plan to the state budget director, the secretary of the Executive Cabinet, and the Legislative Research Commission with each biennial budget request.

Each strategic plan shall include but not be limited to:

A statement of the cabinet or administrative entity’s value, vision, and mission;

A statement of how the cabinet or administrative entity’s strategic plan is aligned with the Governor’s goals and linked to the budget request and the six (6) year capital plan of the cabinet or administrative entity;

A brief summary of a situation analysis conducted by the program cabinet or administrative entity;

Identification of measurable goals for the next four (4) years;

Specification of objectives to meet the stated goals;

Identification of performance indicators to be used to measure progress toward meeting goals and objectives; and

A progress report providing data and information on the performance indicators set forth in the program cabinet or administrative entity’s most recent strategic plan.

On or before September 1 of each even-numbered fiscal year, program cabinets and administrative entities which have submitted strategic plans in the previous fiscal year shall submit a progress report to the Office of the State Budget Director, or its designee, which provides data and information regarding the progress the program cabinet or entity has made toward meeting its goals as measured by performance indicators set forth in the cabinet’s or entity’s most recent strategic plan.

The state budget director shall designate an entity to develop and implement a methodology for strategic planning and progress reporting for use by program cabinets and administrative entities submitting strategic plans and progress reports pursuant to this section. The entity designated by the state budget director shall develop and make available a training course in strategic planning that is appropriate for and targeted to state government managers, and shall make that training course available to state managers and their designees who have responsibility for the completion of a strategic plan as required by this section.

The Commonwealth Office of Technology shall maintain uniform electronic strategic plan and progress report submission forms and a procedure that allows all plans and progress reports to be entered into an electronic database that is searchable by interested parties. The database shall be developed and maintained in a form that complies with all provisions of KRS

48.950

,

48.955

, and

48.960

. The Commonwealth Office of Technology shall develop and maintain a program to provide public access to submitted plans and progress reports.

History.

Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 144, § 1, effective July 15, 2002; 2005, ch. 85, § 78, effective June 20, 2005; 2007, ch. 47, § 34, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 117, § 40, effective July 15, 2010.